Louisiana, session 2026, HB397.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:39.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§39.3. Reckless throwing from parade float
A. It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or negligently throw an object
from a parade float in a manner that is foreseeable to cause injury to another person.
B.(1) Whoever commits the crime of reckless throwing from a parade float
shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars.
(2) When the reckless throwing from a parade float causes another person
injury, the offender shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned
not more than six months, or both.
(3) When the reckless throwing from a parade float causes another person
serious bodily injury as defined in R.S. 14:2, the offender shall be fined not less than
two thousand dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for not less than one
year nor more than three years, or both.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-991 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 397
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a specific item or
the handing, dropping, or responsible tossing of any item that is not otherwise
prohibited by law.